Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5116.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 41. (1) A millionaire party licensee shall ensure that an
event conducted under the license is conducted in compliance with
this act and the rules promulgated under this act.
(2) A millionaire party licensee shall post the license so
that it is conspicuously visible at the location where the event is
being conducted at all times during the event.
(3) A millionaire party licensee shall not conduct gaming
under the license anywhere outside of the demarcated area approved
by the executive director.
THS H04192'25 (H-1) 86c9mj


(4) A millionaire party licensee shall ensure that access to
the demarcated area is controlled.
(5) A millionaire party licensee shall not allow an individual
who is less than 18 years old of age to enter the demarcated area
when gaming is being conducted there.
(6) If alcoholic beverages are served at an event, an
individual in the demarcated area who is 18 years old of age or
older but less than 21 years old of age must be identified by
wearing a mark indicating that a member or agent of the millionaire
party licensee has verified the individual's age and
identification.
(7) A millionaire party licensee shall not receive more than
$20,000.00 $35,000.00 in exchange for imitation money or chips on
any day under the license. However, if the licensee conducts the
millionaire party without using dealers from a supplier and owns
the location at which the millionaire party is held and if the
license is for fewer than 4 days of gaming, the daily limit under
this subsection is determined by dividing $80,000.00 $140,000.00 by
the number of days of gaming allowed under the license.
(8) A millionaire party licensee may conduct a charity game as
provided in section 7b and may conduct a numeral game as provided
in section 7c. If a millionaire party licensee conducts a charity
game or a numeral game, the executive director has sole enforcement
and supervision authority over the conduct of the game.
Final Page
THS H04192'25 (H-1) 86c9mj